Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-923
Registered voters; privileges on election day.

Registered voters shall in all cases, except treason, felony, or breach of the peace, be privileged from arrest during the attendance at elections and while going to and returning from the same. No registered voter shall be obliged to do military duty on election day except in time of war and public danger.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 266.